New York, session 2025-2026, S2534.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 26-605 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York is amended by adding a new subdivision (c-1) to read as 3 follows: 4 (c-1) For any eligible head of household who submits an application 5 for a rent increase exemption order pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) 6 of this section, the date of such application shall be deemed to be (i) 7 the date of the applicant's initial eligibility for a rent increase 8 exemption order, if the actual date of submission of the application is 9 two years or less after such date of initial eligibility, or (ii) the 10 date which is two years prior to the actual date of the submission of 11 the application, if such application is submitted more than two years 12 after the applicant's date of initial eligibility for a rent increase 13 exemption order, and the calculation of such rent increase exemption, 14 prospectively, shall be based upon the applicant's initial date of 15 eligibility and not upon the date of such application, provided, howev- 16 er, that the provisions of this subdivision shall only apply to the 17 calculation of benefits and no prior rental payments attributable to any 18 rent increase prior to the date of application shall be subject to 19 recoupment. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06870-01-5